Utah statutes.
58-73-301.   Licensure required -- License classifications.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of chiropractic, except as specifically provided in Section 58-73-304.

(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a license in the classification of chiropractic physician.

